Vermont, session 2025-2026, S202.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 201 is amended to read:
§ 201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(9) “Plug-in photovoltaic device” means a photovoltaic generation
device that:
(A) is designed to be connected to a building’s electrical system via
an electrical cord plugged into a receptacle;
(B) includes a feature that prevents the system from energizing the
building’s electrical system during a power outage;
(C) complies with UL 3700 for plug-in photovoltaic systems by UL
Solutions or an equivalent certification by an equivalent Nationally
Recognized Testing Laboratory for use in the United States and is installed and
operated in compliance with IEEE 1547-2018 and any successor standard,
using default performance and setting profiles consistent with those developed
by regional transmission and distribution system operators; and
(D) is connected to a building that is connected to the electric grid.
VT LEG #390233 v.1

No. 149 Page 2 of 6
2026
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 256 is added to read:
§ 256. PLUG-IN PHOTOVOLTAIC DEVICES
(a) A customer may install one or more plug-in photovoltaic devices per
electric meter if the devices have a maximum combined inverter capacity of
not more than 1,200 watts. Plug-in photovoltaic devices shall only be
connected to systems using smart meters. A customer shall ensure a device is
temporarily but securely attached to the ground or a structure.
(b) The installation of a plug-in photovoltaic device that complies with
subsection (a) of this section shall not be required to comply with the
requirements of section 248 of this chapter, shall not be required to obtain an
interconnection agreement with an electric distribution company, and shall not
otherwise be subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission.
(c) An electric distribution company shall not require a customer using a
plug-in photovoltaic device that complies with subsection (a) of this section to:
(1) obtain the company’s approval before installing or using the device;
(2) pay any fee or charge related to the installation of the device; or
(3) install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is
integrated into the device.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent an electric distribution company
from recovering costs associated with the overloading of the service provided
due to the presence of a plug-in photovoltaic device.
VT LEG #390233 v.1

No. 149 Page 3 of 6
2026
(e) A customer with a net metering system shall not also install a plug-in
photovoltaic device. A plug-in photovoltaic device shall not be eligible for net
metering. Generation exported to the grid by a plug-in photovoltaic device
shall not be compensated by an electric distribution company.
(f) A plug-in photovoltaic device in a public building, as defined in
20 V.S.A. § 2730, shall be used in a manner that complies with all applicable
requirements of the most recent Fire and Building Safety Code adopted by the
Division of Fire Safety.
(g) A tenant shall provide at least 10 days’ notice to the landlord of the
tenant’s intent to install a plug-in photovoltaic device in compliance with
subsection (a) of this section in the building. The landlord shall respond within
10 days with any reasonable restrictions on the installation of the device,
including requiring the tenant to pay for any required electrical work and
hiring a licensed electrician to do the work. If the landlord does not respond
within 10 days, the tenant may proceed with installation. A tenant shall not
perform or hire someone to perform electrical work on the premises for the
installation of a plug-in photovoltaic device without the landlord’s permission.
A landlord shall not be compelled to perform or pay for electrical work on the
premises to allow for the installation of a plug-in photovoltaic device.
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 4413(g) is amended to read:
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a bylaw adopted
under this chapter shall not:
VT LEG #390233 v.1

No. 149 Page 4 of 6
2026
(1) Regulate the installation, operation, and maintenance of a plug-in
photovoltaic device or, on a flat roof of an otherwise complying structure, of a
solar energy device that heats water or space or generates electricity. For the
purpose of this subdivision, “flat roof” means a roof having a slope less than or
equal to five degrees.
(2) Prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the installation of solar
collectors not exempted from regulation under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, clotheslines, or other energy devices based on renewable resources.
Sec. 4. 27 V.S.A. § 544 is amended to read:
§ 544. ENERGY DEVICES BASED ON RENEWABLE RESOURCES
(a) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running
with the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting solar collectors,
clotheslines, or other energy devices based on renewable resources from being
installed on or, for a plug-in photovoltaic device as defined in 30 V.S.A. § 201,
appurtenant to buildings erected on the lots or parcels covered by the deed
restrictions, covenants, or binding agreements. A property owner may not be
denied permission to install solar collectors or other energy devices based on
renewable resources by any entity granted the power or right in any deed
restriction, covenant, or similar binding agreement to approve, forbid, control,
or direct alteration of property with respect to residential dwellings. For
purposes of this subsection, that entity may determine the specific location
where solar collectors may be installed on the roof within an orientation to the
VT LEG #390233 v.1

No. 149 Page 5 of 6
2026
south or within 45° east or west of due south, provided that this determination
does not impair the effective operation of the solar collectors.
* * *
(c) The legislative intent in enacting this section is to protect the public
health, safety, and welfare by encouraging the development and use of
renewable resources in order to conserve and protect the value of land,
buildings, and resources by preventing measures that will have the ultimate
effect, whether or not intended, of driving the costs of owning and operating
commercial or residential property beyond the capacity of private owners to
maintain. This section shall not apply to patio railings in condominiums,
cooperatives, or apartments, except for a plug-in photovoltaic device.
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 2795 is amended to read:
§ 2795. EFFICIENCY AND WATER CONSERVATION STANDARDS
(a) The Commissioner shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions
of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types
of new products set forth in section 2794 of this title. The rules shall provide
for the following minimum efficiency standards for products sold or installed
in this State:
* * *
(6) In the rules, the Commissioner shall adopt minimum efficiency and
water conservation standards for each product that is subject to a standard
under 10 C.F.R. §§ 430 and 431 as those provisions existed on January 19,
VT LEG #390233 v.1

No. 149 Page 6 of 6
2026
2017 2025. The minimum standard and the testing protocol for each product
shall be the same as adopted in those sections of the Code of Federal
Regulations, except that for faucets, showerheads, and urinals, the minimum
standard and testing protocol shall be as otherwise set forth in this section.
* * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390233 v.1